lexc/inoun.lexc
LEXICON rabti3
!!!!!final vowel aware
0:0 takid2;
@D.VOWEL@+وربطی۱:@D.VOWEL@*م takid2;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@+وربطی۱:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@×م takid2;
@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@+وربطی۱:@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@*م takid2;
@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@+وربطی۱:@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@*م takid2;
@D.VOWEL@+وربطی۱:@D.VOWEL@×ام takid2;
@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@+وربطی۱:@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@×ام takid2;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@+وربطی۱:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@×ام takid2;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@+وربطی۱:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@*ام takid2;
@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@+وربطی۱:@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@*ام takid2;
@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@+وربطی۱:@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@*یم takid2;
@D.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@+وربطی۲:@D.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@*ی takid2;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@+وربطی۲:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@*ای takid2;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@+وربطی۲:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@*یی takid2;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@+وربطی۲:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@×ای takid2;
@R.VOWEL.YEH@@P.VOWEL.YEH@+وربطی۲:@R.VOWEL.YEH@@P.VOWEL.YEH@×ای takid2;
@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@+وربطی۲:@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@*ای takid2;
@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@+وربطی۲:@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.YEH@*یی takid2;
@D.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.HEH@+وربطی۳:@D.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.HEH@*ه takid2;
@D.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@+وربطی۳:@D.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@*ست takid2;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@+وربطی۳:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@×ست takid2;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.HEH@+وربطی۳:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.HEH@*ئه takid2;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.HEH@+وربطی۳:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.HEH@*ست takid2;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@+وربطی۳:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@¤س takid2;
@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.HEH@+وربطی۳:@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@@P.VOWEL.HEH@*ه takid2;
@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.HEH@+وربطی۳:@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@@P.VOWEL.HEH@*ست takid2;
@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@+وربطی۳:@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@*س takid2;
@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@+وربطی۳:@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@*ست takid2;
@D.VOWEL@+وربطی۴:@D.VOWEL@*یم takid2;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@+وربطی۴:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@*ایم takid2;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@+وربطی۴:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@*ییم takid2;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@+وربطی۴:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@×ایم takid2;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@+وربطی۴:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@×ییم takid2;
@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@+وربطی۴:@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@×ایم takid2;
@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@+وربطی۴:@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@×ییم takid2;
@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@+وربطی۴:@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@*ایم takid2;
@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@+وربطی۴:@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@*ییم takid2;
@D.VOWEL@+وربطی۵:@D.VOWEL@×ید takid2;
@D.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@+وربطی۵:@D.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@×ین takid2;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@+وربطی۵:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@*یید takid2;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@+وربطی۵:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@*یین takid2;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@+وربطی۵:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@*اید takid2;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@+وربطی۵:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@*این takid2;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@+وربطی۵:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@×یید takid2;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@+وربطی۵:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@×یین takid2;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@+وربطی۵:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@×اید takid2;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@+وربطی۵:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@×این takid2;
@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@+وربطی۵:@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@×یید takid2;
@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@+وربطی۵:@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@×یین takid2;
@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@+وربطی۵:@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@×اید takid2;
@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@+وربطی۵:@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@×این takid2;
@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@+وربطی۵:@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@*یید takid2;
@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@+وربطی۵:@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@*یین takid2;
@D.VOWEL@+وربطی۶:@D.VOWEL@*ند takid2;
@D.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@+وربطی۶:@D.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@*ن takid2;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@+وربطی۶:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@*اند takid2;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@+وربطی۶:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@*ند takid2;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@+وربطی۶:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@*ان takid2;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@+وربطی۶:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@*ن takid2;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@+وربطی۶:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@×اند takid2;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@+وربطی۶:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@×ند takid2;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@+وربطی۶:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@×ان takid2;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@+وربطی۶:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@×ن takid2;
@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@+وربطی۶:@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@×اند takid2;
@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@+وربطی۶:@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@×ند takid2;
@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@+وربطی۶:@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@×ان takid2;
@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@+وربطی۶:@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@×ن takid2;
@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@+وربطی۶:@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@*یند takid2;
@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@+وربطی۶:@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@*ن takid2;

LEXICON takid1
@D.VOWEL.HEH@@C.FORMAL@+تاکید:@D.VOWEL.HEH@@C.FORMAL@*ا FINPOINT;
@D.VOWEL.HEH@@C.FORMAL@+تاکید:@D.VOWEL.HEH@@C.FORMAL@×ها FINPOINT;
@D.VOWEL.HEH@@C.FORMAL@+عطف:@D.VOWEL.HEH@@C.FORMAL@*و FINPOINT;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.FORMAL@+تاکید:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.FORMAL@×ا FINPOINT;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.FORMAL@+تاکید:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.FORMAL@×ها FINPOINT;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.FORMAL@+عطف:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.FORMAL@×و FINPOINT;

LEXICON takid2
!!!!!final vowel aware
@D.QPRO@@D.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@+تاکید:@D.QPRO@@D.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@*ا FINPOINT;
@D.QPRO@@D.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@+تاکید:@D.QPRO@@D.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@×ها FINPOINT;
!@D.PREP@@D.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@+عطف:@D.PREP@@D.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@*و FINPOINT;
@D.QPRO@@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.FORMAL@+تاکید:@D.QPRO@@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.FORMAL@*ا FINPOINT;
@D.QPRO@@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.FORMAL@+تاکید:@D.QPRO@@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.FORMAL@*ها FINPOINT;
!@D.PREP@@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.FORMAL@+عطف:@D.PREP@@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.FORMAL@*و FINPOINT;
@D.QPRO@@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.FORMAL@+تاکید:@D.QPRO@@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.FORMAL@×ا FINPOINT;
@D.QPRO@@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.FORMAL@+تاکید:@D.QPRO@@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.FORMAL@×ها FINPOINT;
!@D.PREP@@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.FORMAL@+عطف:@D.PREP@@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.FORMAL@×و FINPOINT;
@D.QPRO@@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.FORMAL@+تاکید:@D.QPRO@@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.FORMAL@*ا FINPOINT;
@D.QPRO@@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.FORMAL@+تاکید:@D.QPRO@@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.FORMAL@×ها FINPOINT;
!@D.PREP@@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.FORMAL@+عطف:@D.PREP@@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.FORMAL@*و FINPOINT;
@D.QPRO@@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.FORMAL@+تاکید:@D.QPRO@@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.FORMAL@×ها FINPOINT;
!@D.PREP@@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.FORMAL@+عطف:@D.PREP@@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.FORMAL@*و FINPOINT;
: FINPOINT;

LEXICON advFRM
@P.FORMAL.ON@0:@P.FORMAL.ON@0 advPath;

LEXICON advPath
!!!!!final vowel aware
@D.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@+تاکید:@D.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@*ا FINPOINT;
@D.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@+تاکید:@D.VOWEL@@C.FORMAL@×ها FINPOINT;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.FORMAL@+تاکید:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.FORMAL@*ا FINPOINT;
@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.FORMAL@+تاکید:@R.VOWEL.VAV@@C.FORMAL@*ها FINPOINT;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.FORMAL@+تاکید:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.FORMAL@×ا FINPOINT;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.FORMAL@+تاکید:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.FORMAL@×ها FINPOINT;
@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.FORMAL@+تاکید:@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.FORMAL@*ا FINPOINT;
@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.FORMAL@+تاکید:@R.VOWEL.YEH@@C.FORMAL@×ها FINPOINT;
@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.FORMAL@+تاکید:@R.VOWEL.ALEF@@C.FORMAL@×ها FINPOINT;
@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.FORMAL@+هم:@R.VOWEL.HEH@@C.FORMAL@×م FINPOINT;
@D.VOWEL.HEH@@C.FORMAL@+هم:@D.VOWEL.HEH@@C.FORMAL@*م FINPOINT;
0:0 FINPOINT;

LEXICON verbalStructFRM
@P.FORMAL.ON@:@P.FORMAL.ON@ verbalStruct;

LEXICON verbalStruct
@R.INFINITIVE@ن:@R.INFINITIVE@*ن consnHaComNN;
@R.PASTPARTICIPLE@@P.VOWEL.HEH@ه:@R.PASTPARTICIPLE@@P.VOWEL.HEH@*ه consnHaComNN;

LEXICON pastStem
آگاهوند verbalStruct;
افشوند verbalStruct;
پاشوند verbalStruct;
پروند verbalStruct;
پزوند verbalStruct;
پکوند verbalStruct;
پلاسوند verbalStruct;
پوسوند verbalStruct;
پوشوند verbalStruct;
پیچوند verbalStruct;
تابوند verbalStruct;
تازوند verbalStruct;
تاروند verbalStruct;
تپوند verbalStruct;
ترسوند verbalStruct;
تراشوند verbalStruct;
ترکوند verbalStruct;
تکوند verbalStruct;
جنبوند verbalStruct;
جوشوند verbalStruct;
چپوند verbalStruct;
چرخوند verbalStruct;
چروند verbalStruct;
چزوند verbalStruct;
چسبوند verbalStruct;
چشوند verbalStruct;
چکوند verbalStruct;
چلوند verbalStruct;
چلونید verbalStruct;
خاروند verbalStruct;
خراشوند verbalStruct;
خشکوند verbalStruct;
خندوند verbalStruct;
خوابوند verbalStruct;!!!!خابوند
خوروند verbalStruct;
خوند verbalStruct;
خیسوند verbalStruct;
دووند verbalStruct;
رسوند verbalStruct;
رقصوند verbalStruct;
رنجوند verbalStruct;
روند verbalStruct;
زاوند verbalStruct;
سابوند verbalStruct;
سوزوند verbalStruct;
شوروند verbalStruct;
شکوند verbalStruct;
شناسوند verbalStruct;
شوروند verbalStruct;
غلتوند verbalStruct;
قبولوند verbalStruct;
فشوند verbalStruct;
فهموند verbalStruct;
کشوند verbalStruct;
کوبوند verbalStruct;
گدازوند verbalStruct;
گذروند verbalStruct;!!!!corpus
گردوند verbalStruct;
گریزوند verbalStruct;
گریوند verbalStruct;
گستروند verbalStruct;
گنجوند verbalStruct;
گندوند verbalStruct;
لرزوند verbalStruct;
لغزوند verbalStruct;
لمبوند verbalStruct;
مالوند verbalStruct;
نالوند verbalStruct;
نشوند verbalStruct;
نوشوند verbalStruct;
نمایوند verbalStruct;
ورزوند verbalStruct;
درخشوند verbalStruct;
خوند verbalStruct;
شوتید verbalStruct;
اومد verbalStruct;
تونست verbalStruct;
درموند verbalStruct;
دویید verbalStruct;
موند verbalStruct;
دونست verbalStruct;
آزمود verbalStructFRM;
آفرید verbalStructFRM;
آلود verbalStructFRM;
آمیزید verbalStructFRM;
افراخت verbalStructFRM;
افزود verbalStructFRM;
افکند verbalStructFRM;
آسایید verbalStructFRM;
آمایید verbalStructFRM;
افتاد verbalStructFRM;
انباشت verbalStructFRM;
اندوخت verbalStructFRM;
انگیخت verbalStructFRM;
ایستاد verbalStructFRM;
بارانید verbalStructFRM;
بالانید verbalStructFRM;
بخشایید verbalStructFRM;
براند verbalStructFRM;!!!!
بلعید verbalStructFRM;
بوسید verbalStructFRM;
پاشید verbalStructFRM;
پالایید verbalStructFRM;
پخشاند verbalStructFRM;
پذیرفت verbalStructFRM;
پرچید verbalStructFRM;
پرسید verbalStructFRM;
پرهیزید verbalStructFRM;
پزاند verbalStructFRM;
پفید verbalStructFRM;
پلاساند verbalStructFRM;!!!!
پناهید verbalStructFRM;
پوسانید verbalStructFRM;
پوشید verbalStructFRM;
پیچید verbalStructFRM;
پیمود verbalStructFRM;
تابید verbalStructFRM;
تازاند verbalStructFRM;
تپاند verbalStructFRM;
تراشانید verbalStructFRM;
ترسانید verbalStructFRM;
ترکاند verbalStructFRM;
تکید verbalStructFRM;
توپید verbalStructFRM;
جست verbalStructFRM;
جنگید verbalStructFRM;
جوشید verbalStructFRM;
جهانید verbalStructFRM;
چپاند verbalStructFRM;
چرانید verbalStructFRM;
چرخاند verbalStructFRM;
چروکید verbalStructFRM;
چسباند verbalStructFRM;
چشاند verbalStructFRM;
چکانید verbalStructFRM;
چمید verbalStructFRM;
خارید verbalStructFRM;
خروشاند verbalStructFRM;
خزاند verbalStructFRM;
خشکانید verbalStructFRM;
خمید verbalStructFRM;
خواباند verbalStructFRM;
خواند verbalStructFRM;
خیزاند verbalStructFRM;
خیسید verbalStructFRM;
درخشاند verbalStructFRM;
دریافت verbalStructFRM;
دزدید verbalStructFRM;
دوانید verbalStructFRM;
دید verbalStructFRM;
ربایید verbalStructFRM;
رساند verbalStructFRM;
رفت verbalStructFRM;
رماند verbalStructFRM;
رنجانید verbalStructFRM;
روبید verbalStructFRM;
رویید verbalStructFRM;
رهید verbalStructFRM;
زائید verbalStructFRM;
زایاند verbalStructFRM;
زدایید verbalStructFRM;
ژولید verbalStructFRM;
ساخت verbalStructFRM;
سپوخت verbalStructFRM;!!!!
ستیزید verbalStructFRM;
سرکشید verbalStructFRM;!!!!
سنجید verbalStructFRM;
شتاباند verbalStructFRM;
شد verbalStructFRM;!!!!
شکست verbalStructFRM;
شمارد verbalStructFRM;
شناسانید verbalStructFRM;
شورانید verbalStructFRM;
صرفید verbalStructFRM;
غرمبید verbalStructFRM;
غلتید verbalStructFRM;
فرمود verbalStructFRM;
فریبید verbalStructFRM;
فشرد verbalStructFRM;
فهمید verbalStructFRM;
قطبید verbalStructFRM;
کاوید verbalStructFRM;
کشاند verbalStructFRM;
کوچاند verbalStructFRM;
کوفت verbalStructFRM;
گدازانید verbalStructFRM;
گرایید verbalStructFRM;
گریخت verbalStructFRM;
گسست verbalStructFRM;
گنجاند verbalStructFRM;
لافید verbalStructFRM;
لمباند verbalStructFRM;
لیسید verbalStructFRM;
میراند verbalStructFRM;
نگاشت verbalStructFRM;
نوشید verbalStructFRM;
هراساند verbalStructFRM;!!!!
